6.4.1/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
SFX c3 Y 384
SFX c3 er er/m't's' er po:infi
SFX c3 er ant/m't's' [^cg]er po:ppre
SFX c3 écer éçant/m't's' écer po:ppre
SFX c3 éger égeant/m't's' éger po:ppre
SFX c3 ébrer èbre/m's' ébrer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 écer èce/m's' écer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 écher èche/m's' écher po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 écrer ècre/m's' écrer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 éder ède/m's' éder po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 éger ège/m's' éger po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 égler ègle/m's' égler po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 égner ègne/m's' égner po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 égrer ègre/m's' égrer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 éguer ègue/m's' éguer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 éler èle/m's' éler po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 émer ème/m's' émer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 éner ène/m's' éner po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 éper èpe/m's' éper po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 équer èque/m's' équer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 érer ère/m's' érer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 éser èse/m's' éser po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 éter ète/m's' éter po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 étrer ètre/m's' étrer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 évrer èvre/m's' évrer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 éyer èye/m's' éyer po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX c3 er è/m' er po:ipre po:1isg
SFX c3 ébrer èbres/t' ébrer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 écer èces/t' écer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 écher èches/t' écher po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 écrer ècres/t' écrer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 éder èdes/t' éder po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 éger èges/t' éger po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 égler ègles/t' égler po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 égner ègnes/t' égner po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 égrer ègres/t' égrer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 éguer ègues/t' éguer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 éler èles/t' éler po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 émer èmes/t' émer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 éner ènes/t' éner po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 éper èpes/t' éper po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 équer èques/t' équer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 érer ères/t' érer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 éser èses/t' éser po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 éter ètes/t' éter po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 étrer ètres/t' étrer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 évrer èvres/t' évrer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 éyer èyes/t' éyer po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX c3 er ons [^cg]er po:ipre po:1pl
SFX c3 écer éçons écer po:ipre po:1pl
SFX c3 éger égeons éger po:ipre po:1pl
SFX c3 er ez er po:ipre po:2pl
SFX c3 ébrer èbrent/s' ébrer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 écer ècent/s' écer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 écher èchent/s' écher po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 écrer ècrent/s' écrer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 éder èdent/s' éder po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 éger ègent/s' éger po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 égler èglent/s' égler po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 égner ègnent/s' égner po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 égrer ègrent/s' égrer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 éguer èguent/s' éguer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 éler èlent/s' éler po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 émer èment/s' émer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 éner ènent/s' éner po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 éper èpent/s' éper po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 équer èquent/s' équer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 érer èrent/s' érer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 éser èsent/s' éser po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 éter ètent/s' éter po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 étrer ètrent/s' étrer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 évrer èvrent/s' évrer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 éyer èyent/s' éyer po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX c3 er ais/m't' [^cg]er po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c3 écer éçais/m't' écer po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c3 éger égeais/m't' éger po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX c3 er ait/s' [^cg]er po:iimp po:3sg
SFX c3 écer éçait/s' écer po:iimp po:3sg
SFX c3 éger égeait/s' éger po:iimp po:3sg
SFX c3 er ions er po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX c3 er iez er po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX c3 er aient/s' [^cg]er po:iimp po:3pl
SFX c3 écer éçaient/s' écer po:iimp po:3pl
SFX c3 éger égeaient/s' éger po:iimp po:3pl
SFX c3 er ai/m' [^cg]er po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX c3 écer éçai/m' écer po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX c3 éger égeai/m' éger po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX c3 er as/t' [^cg]er po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX c3 écer éças/t' écer po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX c3 éger égeas/t' éger po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX c3 er a/s' [^cg]er po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX c3 écer éça/s' écer po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX c3 éger égea/s' éger po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX c3 er âmes [^cg]er po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX c3 écer éçâmes écer po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX c3 éger égeâmes éger po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX c3 er âtes [^cg]er po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX c3 écer éçâtes écer po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX c3 éger égeâtes éger po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX c3 er èrent/s' er po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX c3 er erai/m' er po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 ébrer èbrerai/m' ébrer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 écer ècerai/m' écer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 écher ècherai/m' écher po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 écrer ècrerai/m' écrer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 éder èderai/m' éder po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 éger ègerai/m' éger po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 égler èglerai/m' égler po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 égner ègnerai/m' égner po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 égrer ègrerai/m' égrer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 éguer èguerai/m' éguer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 éler èlerai/m' éler po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 émer èmerai/m' émer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 éner ènerai/m' éner po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 éper èperai/m' éper po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 équer èquerai/m' équer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 érer èrerai/m' érer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 éser èserai/m' éser po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 éter èterai/m' éter po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 étrer ètrerai/m' étrer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 évrer èvrerai/m' évrer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 éyer èyerai/m' éyer po:ifut po:1sg
SFX c3 er eras/t' er po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 ébrer èbreras/t' ébrer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 écer èceras/t' écer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 écher ècheras/t' écher po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 écrer ècreras/t' écrer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 éder èderas/t' éder po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 éger ègeras/t' éger po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 égler ègleras/t' égler po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 égner ègneras/t' égner po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 égrer ègreras/t' égrer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 éguer ègueras/t' éguer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 éler èleras/t' éler po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 émer èmeras/t' émer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 éner èneras/t' éner po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 éper èperas/t' éper po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 équer èqueras/t' équer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 érer èreras/t' érer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 éser èseras/t' éser po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 éter èteras/t' éter po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 étrer ètreras/t' étrer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 évrer èvreras/t' évrer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 éyer èyeras/t' éyer po:ifut po:2sg
SFX c3 er era/s' er po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 ébrer èbrera/s' ébrer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 écer ècera/s' écer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 écher èchera/s' écher po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 écrer ècrera/s' écrer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 éder èdera/s' éder po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 éger ègera/s' éger po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 égler èglera/s' égler po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 égner ègnera/s' égner po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 égrer ègrera/s' égrer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 éguer èguera/s' éguer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 éler èlera/s' éler po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 émer èmera/s' émer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 éner ènera/s' éner po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 éper èpera/s' éper po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 équer èquera/s' équer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 érer èrera/s' érer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 éser èsera/s' éser po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 éter ètera/s' éter po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 étrer ètrera/s' étrer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 évrer èvrera/s' évrer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 éyer èyera/s' éyer po:ifut po:3sg
SFX c3 er erons er po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c3 ébrer èbrerons ébrer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c3 écer ècerons écer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c3 écher ècherons écher po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c3 écrer ècrerons écrer po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c3 éder èderons éder po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c3 éger ègerons éger po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c3 égler èglerons égler po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c3 égner ègnerons égner po:ifut po:1pl
SFX c3 égrer ègrerons égrer po:ifut po:1pl
